Florida, session 2026, SB1062.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 70 71 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âFlorida Speech and 72 Debate Education Act.â 73 Section 2.âSection 265.0042, Florida Statutes, is created 74 to read: 75 265.0042âFlorida Speech and Debate Hall of Fame.â 76 (1)âThere is created the Florida Speech and Debate Hall of 77 Fame. The Department of Management Services shall set aside an 78 area on the plaza level of the Capitol Building and shall 79 consult with the Florida Education Foundation and the 80 Commissioner of Education regarding the design and theme of the 81 area. 82 (2)âThe hall of fame shall do all of the following: 83 (a)âHonor distinguished students, coaches, educators, 84 alumni, veterans, public servants, benefactors, and supporters 85 who have elevated speech and debate in this state. 86 (b)âPreserve the history, impact, and cultural significance 87 of competitive debate. 88 (c)âInspire future generations of Florida students to 89 pursue speech, debate, public leadership, and civic excellence. 90 (3)âThe hall of fame shall convene a committee to establish 91 procedures to nominate and select individuals to be featured. 92 The committee must include at least one member or his or her 93 designee from the Florida Debate Initiative, Inc. 94 Section 3.âSection 683.221, Florida Statutes, is created to 95 read: 96 683.221âFlorida Speech and Debate Week.â 97 (1)âFebruary 1 through February 7 shall be annually 98 designated as âFlorida Speech and Debate Week.â 99 (2)âFlorida Speech and Debate Week shall be observed for 100 all of the following purposes: 101 (a)âTo recognize the academic, civic, and leadership value 102 of competitive speech and debate. 103 (b)âTo honor educators, coaches, judges, and school 104 districts that support debate programming. 105 (c)âTo inspire students statewide to participate in debate 106 as a pathway to civic engagement. 107 (d)âTo promote Floridaâs role as the national leader in 108 scholastic speech and debate. 109 (3)âPublic and charter schools, state agencies, and other 110 entities may observe Florida Speech and Debate Week. 111 Section 4.âSection 1000.09, Florida Statutes, is created to 112 read: 113 1000.09âCompetitive speech and debate.â 114 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.â 115 (a)âThe Legislature finds that speech and debate 116 significantly improve literacy, critical thinking, research 117 ability, civic knowledge, and leadership for students of this 118 state. 119 (b)âThe Legislature also finds that this stateâs civics and 120 debate expansion has become a national model, increasing access 121 to this instruction in all regions. Sustaining and improving 122 upon this success requires a permanent statewide organization 123 with specialized expertise, program capacity, and year-round 124 operational support. 125 (c)âThe Legislature further finds that the Florida Debate 126 Initiative, Inc., (FDI) has demonstrated statewide effectiveness 127 and is uniquely positioned to ensure continuity, equitable 128 access, quality programming, tournament infrastructure, and 129 instructional rigor. It is the intent of the Legislature to 130 establish a comprehensive statewide infrastructure, under FDIâs 131 direction, that expands, supports, and elevates Kâ20 speech and 132 debate education. 133 (2)âCREATION, DESIGNATION, AND RESPONSIBILITIES.âFDI is 134 designated as the official statewide speech and debate 135 organization responsible for managing, developing, and expanding 136 Kâ20 speech and debate programs. 137 (a)1.âFDI shall do all of the following: 138 a.âManage the official Florida Speech and Debate League and 139 its regional teams. 140 b.âEstablish statewide competition rules, ballots, judging 141 standards, and tournament calendars. 142 c.âOperate or supervise district, regional, and state 143 tournaments. 144 d.âTrain and certify coaches, judges, volunteers, and 145 tournament staff. 146 e.âProvide statewide programmatic support, including 147 student programs, educator training, and public service 148 initiatives. 149 f.âMaintain statewide data reporting and annual 150 accountability. 151 g.âWork constructively with nonstate-sanctioned leagues 152 while upholding Floridaâs civic and patriotic development goals. 153 2.âThis paragraph may not be construed to prohibit schools, 154 districts, or students from participating in speech and debate 155 activities, leagues, or competitions not operated or supervised 156 by FDI. 157 (b)âFDI may establish and maintain partnerships with school 158 districts, charter schools, state agencies, postsecondary 159 institutions, nonprofit organizations, private entities, and 160 national or international organizations to achieve the purposes 161 of this section. 162 (3)âSTATEWIDE PROGRAMS.âFDI shall implement and maintain a 163 comprehensive suite of statewide programs, including all of the 164 following: 165 (a)âStudent speech and debate programs. 166 (b)âStudent leadership and service programs. 167 (c)âCompetitive speech and debate training for students. 168 (d)âEducator training. 169 (e)âPostsecondary and workforce internships. 170 (f)âOperation of speech and debate tournaments. 171 (4)âAUTHORIZED USES OF FUNDS.âFDI may expend program funds 172 on all of the following: 173 (a)âAdministrative operations, including staffing, 174 insurance, compliance, reporting, and statewide infrastructure. 175 (b)âProgrammatic operations, including curriculum, 176 training, summer programs, workshops, camps, and mentorship 177 programs. 178 (c)âTournament operations, including logistics, staff, 179 judge training, technology, awards, and regional team 180 operations. 181 (d)âTravel, lodging, training, and transportation for 182 participants. 183 (e)âPublic-private partnership development, including 184 sponsorship and philanthropic support. 185 (f)âMemberships, affiliations, and participation fees 186 related to civics education, speech, debate, leadership, and 187 academic competition programs, provided such memberships advance 188 the purposes of this section. 189 (5)âACCOUNTABILITY AND REPORTING.âFDI shall make publicly 190 available online and submit, no later than December 31, an 191 annual report to the Department of Education which includes all 192 of the following: 193 (a)âStudent participation in statewide programs, by 194 district and demographics. 195 (b)âThe number of active student teams in statewide speech 196 and debate programs. 197 (c)âCompetitive and educational outcomes of statewide 198 programs. 199 (d)âA categorized summary of all expenditures. 200 (6)âENDORSEMENT IN SPEECH AND DEBATE.âPursuant to s. 201 1012.56 and State Board of Education rule, a certified teacher 202 may earn an endorsement in speech and debate if he or she 203 demonstrates all of the following: 204 (a)âCompletion of coursework approved by the state board in 205 argumentation, rhetoric, communication, or debate instruction. 206 (b)âCompletion of professional development offered by the 207 FDI or equivalent professional development offered by a Florida 208 College System institution or state university. 209 (c)âCompetency, as determined by the board, in the rules, 210 events, and competitive standards of scholastic debate. 211 (7)âREGIONAL TRAVELING DEBATE TEAMS.âThe department shall 212 collaborate with FDI to establish regional traveling debate 213 teams to represent this state in national competitions. Teams 214 must be accessible to students at Title I and rural schools. 215 Teams must provide competitive training and coaching for speech 216 and debate. 217 (a)âAll travel costs may be covered through legislative 218 appropriation, public-private partnerships, and sponsorships. 219 (b)âA school district may use school buses to transport 220 students to and from speech and debate competitions. 221 (8)âDEBATE ACROSS THE CURRICULUM PILOT PROGRAM.â 222 (a)âThe Debate Across the Curriculum Pilot Program is 223 created within the department, in collaboration with FDI. The 224 purpose of the pilot program is to develop and integrate 225 structured debate and argumentation into core academic subjects. 226 The pilot program must include curriculum development, 227 professional development, instructional materials, and program 228 evaluation. 229 (b)âThis subsection expires June 30, 2027. 230 (9)(a)âFLORIDA SPEECH AND DEBATE ACADEMY.âFDI shall 231 establish and operate a charter school under s. 1002.33 named 232 the Florida Speech and Debate Academy. 233 (b)âThe charter school shall provide a rigorous academic 234 program emphasizing civics education, leadership development, 235 speech, debate, rhetoric, and public service. 236 Section 5.âPresent subsection (29) of section 1001.42, 237 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (30), and a new 238 subsection (29) is added to that section, to read: 239 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 240 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 241 powers and perform all duties listed below: 242 (29)âSPEECH AND DEBATE COMPETITION REPORTING.âEach district 243 school board shall annually publish online and submit to the 244 Department of Education, by a date set by the department, a 245 report that includes all of the following information: 246 (a)âThe number of active speech and debate teams. 247 (b)âStudent participation rates. 248 (c)âCompetitive performance and public service engagement. 249 (d)âTransportation, facilities, and administrative support 250 provided. 251 (e)âResources needed to expand the program. 252 Section 6.âPresent subsection (11) of section 1002.37, 253 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (12), and a new 254 subsection (11) is added to that section, to read: 255 1002.37âThe Florida Virtual School.â 256 (11)âThe Florida Virtual School shall establish the 257 Institute for Speech and Debate Innovation. The institute shall 258 do all of the following: 259 (a)âDevelop an online curriculum, micro-credentials, and 260 instructional modules for speech and debate. 261 (b)âCreate artificial intelligence-based coaching tools, 262 digital judging tutorials, and analytics dashboards. 263 (c)âProduce virtual reality and augmented reality 264 simulations for competitive practice. 265 (d)âEnsure equitable access for districts lacking onsite 266 coaching capacity. 267 (e)âCoordinate and operate with the Florida Debate 268 Initiative, Inc., and enter a formal partnership to coordinate 269 curriculum, instructional resources, competition preparation, 270 and statewide access to speech and debate programming. 271 Section 7.âParagraph (i) is added to subsection (3) of 272 section 1003.4282, Florida Statutes, to read: 273 1003.4282âRequirements for a standard high school diploma.â 274 (3)âSTANDARD HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA; COURSE AND ASSESSMENT 275 REQUIREMENTS.â 276 (i)âOne-half credit in speech and debate.âBeginning with 277 students entering grade 9 in the 2028â2029 school year, a 278 student must successfully complete at least one-half credit in 279 speech, debate, argumentation, or rhetoric as a requirement for 280 high school graduation. 281 Section 8.âSection 1004.0983, Florida Statutes, is created 282 to read: 283 1004.0983âSpeech and debate training pathways.âThe Board of 284 Governors and the State Board of Education shall develop 285 undergraduate and graduate coursework, certificates, and micro 286 credentials in speech and debate education, coaching, and 287 tournament operations. 288 (1)âCoursework may include all of the following: 289 (a)âRhetoric, argumentation, and communication theory. 290 (b)âCoaching methods and competitive event instruction. 291 (c)âTournament management and adjudication. 292 (d)âPublic speaking pedagogy. 293 (2)âThe Board of Governors and the State Board of Education 294 may collaborate with the Florida Debate Initiative, Inc., to 295 develop coursework. 296 Section 9.âThe Department of Education shall approve 297 courses developed pursuant to s. 1004.0983, Florida Statutes, 298 for inclusion in dual enrollment programs under s. 1007.271, 299 Florida Statutes. 300 Section 10.â(1)âFor the 2026â2027 fiscal year: 301 (a)âThe sum of $2.4 million in recurring funds is 302 appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to support the 303 Florida Debate Initiative, Inc.âs responsibilities assigned 304 under s. 1000.09(4), Florida Statutes, including administrative, 305 programmatic, and tournament operation duties. 306 (b)âThe sum of $250,000 in recurring funds is appropriated 307 from the General Revenue Fund to support the Florida Debate 308 Initiative, Inc.âs responsibilities assigned under s. 309 1000.09(7), Florida Statutes, including for regional traveling 310 debate teams to support their training, coaching, lodging, and 311 competition costs. 312 (c)âThe sum of $1 million in nonrecurring funds is 313 appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of 314 Education for the Debate Across the Curriculum Pilot Program 315 under s. 1000.09(8), Florida Statutes. 316 (2)âThe sum of $700,000 in recurring funds is appropriated 317 from the General Revenue Fund to school districts for travel 318 costs to attend speech and debate competitions pursuant to s. 319 1000.09, Florida Statutes. 320 (3)âThe sum of $500,000 in recurring funds is appropriated 321 from the General Revenue Fund to the State Board of Education to 322 develop the teacher endorsement under s. 1000.09(6), Florida 323 Statutes, and to support the Florida Speech and Debate Hall of 324 Fame under s. 265.0042, Florida Statutes. 325 (4)âThe sum of $750,000 in recurring funds is appropriated 326 from the General Revenue Fund to the Florida Virtual School to 327 support the Institute for Speech and Debate Innovation pursuant 328 to s. 1002.37(11), Florida Statutes. 329 (5)âFor the 2027â2028 fiscal year: 330 (a)âThe sum of $3.8 million in recurring funds is 331 appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Florida Speech 332 and Debate Academy under s. 1000.09(9), Florida Statutes, for 333 teachers and teacher assistants. 334 (b)âThe sum of $1.5 million in recurring funds is 335 appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Florida Speech 336 and Debate Academy under s. 1000.09(9), Florida Statutes, for 337 other instructional personnel. 338 (c)âThe sum of $708,000 in recurring funds is appropriated 339 from the General Revenue Fund to the Florida Speech and Debate 340 Academy under s. 1000.09(9), Florida Statutes, for the 341 administration. 342 (d)âThe sum of $991,000 in recurring funds is appropriated 343 from the General Revenue Fund to the Florida Speech and Debate 344 Academy under s. 1000.09(9), Florida Statutes, for the operation 345 and maintenance of facilities. 346 (e)âThe sum of $256,000 in recurring funds is appropriated 347 from the General Revenue Fund to the Florida Speech and Debate 348 Academy under s. 1000.09(9), Florida Statutes, for materials, 349 supplies, and capital outlay. 350 (f)âThe sum of $485,000 in recurring funds is appropriated 351 from the General Revenue Fund to the Florida Speech and Debate 352 Academy under s. 1000.09(9), Florida Statutes, for food service. 353 Section 11.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027.